Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1987.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin TITLE.new text end new text begin This act shall be cited as the "Minnesota Starter Home Act." new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [462.3572] STARTER HOME AND NEW HOUSING OPTIONS AUTHORIZED. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Accessory dwelling unit" means an addition or alteration built to the standards of Minnesota Rules, chapter 1309, that is an additional, subordinate dwelling unit on the same lot as a single-family dwelling, and is entirely within a dwelling unit, attached to a dwelling unit, or in a detached structure. new text end new text begin (c) "Applicant" has the meaning provided in section 15.99. new text end new text begin (d) "Duplex" means a building sited on a single lot that contains two separate residential units with separation either horizontal or vertical that is used, intended, or designed to be built, used, rented, leased, let or hired out to be occupied, or occupied for living purposes. new text end new text begin (e) "Minimum parking mandate" means a law, rule, or ordinance that specifies a minimum number of motor vehicle parking spaces, including on-street or off-street within a garage or other enclosed area. new text end new text begin (f) "Request" has the meaning provided in section 15.99. new text end new text begin (g) "Residential unit" means a building or part of a building intended to be used as a dwelling by a single owner or tenant. new text end new text begin (h) "Single-family dwelling" means any building that contains one residential unit used, intended, or designed to be built, used, rented, leased, let or hired out to be occupied, or occupied for living purposes. new text end new text begin (i) "Townhouse" means a single-family dwelling unit constructed in a group of two or more attached units in which each unit extends from the foundation to the roof and having open space on at least two sides of each unit. Each single-family dwelling unit shall be considered to be a separate building. Separate building service utilities shall be provided to each single-family dwelling unit when required by other chapters of the State Building Code. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Residential housing types authorized. new text end new text begin (a) The following types of housing shall be a permitted use in any zoning district that permits a residential use: new text end new text begin (1) single-family dwellings; new text end new text begin (2) duplexes; and new text end new text begin (3) accessory dwelling units, except an accessory dwelling unit is not permitted on a lot that contains a duplex or multifamily housing. new text end new text begin (b) Townhouses shall be a permitted use in any zoning district that permits a residential use on the following lots: new text end new text begin (1) lots platted after June 1, 2025; and new text end new text begin (2) vacant lots. new text end new text begin (c) Subject to the limitations in subdivisions 3, 4, and 5, a development authorized under paragraphs (a) and (b) must comply with any standards, performance conditions, or requirements, including the adequacy of existing public infrastructure, imposed by a city to protect public health, safety, and general welfare. new text end new text begin (d) Nothing in this section authorizes residential development that is prohibited by state or federal law or rule, or is prohibited under an ordinance adopted pursuant to a state or federal law or rule, that protects floodplains, areas of critical or historic concern, wild and scenic rivers, shore land, or that otherwise restrict residential units to protect and preserve public health, the environment, or scenic areas. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Required standards. new text end new text begin (a) The following required standards and limitations apply to the residential buildings allowed under subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (b) Any standards, performance conditions, or requirements imposed by a municipality must directly relate to protecting public health, safety, and general welfare. new text end new text begin (c) A municipality must allow at least two residential units on a residential lot zoned for a single-family home, except a municipality may limit townhouses to one residential unit per lot provided the lot is no larger than 1,500 square feet. new text end new text begin (d) A municipality must permit the following lot sizes if a lot can accommodate greater density: new text end new text begin (1) for duplexes and single-family homes that are connected to municipal water and sewer, a minimum lot size no greater than 5,445 square feet (one-eighth acre); and new text end new text begin (2) for townhomes that are connected to municipal water and sewer, a minimum lot size of no greater than 1,500 square feet. new text end new text begin (e) A municipality must not impose standards, performance conditions, or requirements on the residential developments permitted under subdivision 2 that are more restrictive than those that applied to single-family dwellings within the municipality as of January 1, 2025. new text end new text begin (f) A municipality must not impose the following standards on townhouses: new text end new text begin (1) side setbacks greater than 7.5 feet on each side; new text end new text begin (2) combined minimum front and rear setbacks in excess of 15 feet; new text end new text begin (3) any floor area ratio requirement on a development that otherwise complies with lot coverage and height requirements; or new text end new text begin (4) maximum lot coverage requirements of less than 80 percent, except as required by the design of the municipality's storm water system or otherwise provided in state or federal law or rule. new text end new text begin (g) A municipality must not impose requirements related to construction materials or methods, including architectural elements, building egress, durability, energy efficiency, or light access requirements, except as required by the State Building Code, as defined by section 326B.121, or other state or federal law or rule. new text end new text begin (h) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, home rule charter, or ordinance to the contrary, a political subdivision must not impose a minimum number of parking spaces including on-street or off-street within a garage or other enclosed area. new text end new text begin (i) A municipality must not take any action that requires a residential property to be part of a homeowners association or provide an incentive for such membership. A municipality must not require or incentivize a homeowners association to adopt, revoke, or amend a term in any governing document or a rule or regulation not required under state law. A municipality must not condition approval of a residential building permit or conditional use permit, residential subdivision development or residential planned unit development, or any other permit related to residential development on the: new text end new text begin (1) creation of a homeowners association; new text end new text begin (2) inclusion of any service, feature, or common property necessitating a homeowners association; new text end new text begin (3) inclusion of any terms in a homeowners association declaration, bylaws, articles of incorporation, or any other governing document that is not required under state law; or new text end new text begin (4) adoption or revocation of, or amendment to, a rule or regulation governing the homeowners association or its members. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Administrative approvals. new text end new text begin (a) A municipality must establish and follow an administrative process to review requests related to residential development permitted under subdivision 2, including proposed residential lot splits and subdivisions, in accordance with the process outlined in section 15.99. The administrative process must not impose more restrictive standards or procedures on the residential developments permitted under subdivision 2 than those required to build a single-family dwelling. new text end new text begin (b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a), a municipality engaging in the process established in paragraph (a) in connection with a proposed subdivision: new text end new text begin (1) must approve or deny a request for a building permit or proposed subdivision based on the request's alignment with the municipality's comprehensive plan, applicable zoning requirements, and subdivision regulations; new text end new text begin (2) must not require a conditional use permit or planned unit development agreement, except that a municipality may require a conditional use permit or planned unit development agreement to address an identified and documented risk to health or safety; new text end new text begin (3) may require one community meeting before approval of a request, or more if required by state or federal law, or the project involves or affects a lot located in a historic district under section 138.73; and new text end new text begin (4) must provide any development agreement to the applicant no less than three days in advance of final plat approval, or before final approval of a request if a plat is not required. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Official controls; limitations. new text end new text begin A municipality may not use official controls to prohibit the application of this section, including by imposing performance conditions, standards, requirements, ordinances, fees, exactions, and dedications on any residential unit or development that are more restrictive than those in this section or other municipal law or rule. new text end new text begin Subd. 6. new text end new text begin Interim ordinance. new text end new text begin No municipality shall enact an interim ordinance as provided under section 462.355, subdivision 4, to prohibit or delay the application of this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2026. new text end